Washington statutes.
RCW 26.09.020

Petition—Dissolution of marriage or domestic partnership, legal separation, or for a declaration concerning validity of marriage or domestic partnership—Contents—Parties—Certificate.

(1) A petition in a proceeding for dissolution of marriage or domestic partnership, legal separation, or for a declaration concerning the validity of a marriage or domestic partnership shall allege:

(a) The last known state of residence of each party, and if a party's last known state of residence is Washington, the last known county of residence;

(b) The date and place of the marriage or, for domestic partnerships, the date of registration, and place of residence when the domestic partnership was registered;

(c) If the parties are separated the date on which the separation occurred;

(d) The names and ages of any child dependent upon either or both spouses or either or both domestic partners and whether the wife or domestic partner is pregnant;

(e) Any arrangements as to the residential schedule of, decision making for, dispute resolution for, and support of the children and the maintenance of a spouse or domestic partner;

(f) A statement specifying whether there is community or separate property owned by the parties to be disposed of;

(g) If the county has established a program under RCW 26.12.260, a statement affirming that the moving party met and conferred with the program prior to filing the petition;

(h) The relief sought.

(2) Either or both parties to the marriage or to the domestic partnership may initiate the proceeding.

(3) The petitioner shall complete and file with the petition a certificate under RCW 43.70.150 on the form provided by the department of health and the confidential information form under RCW 26.23.050.

(4) Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit or prohibit the ability of parties to obtain appropriate emergency orders.

[ 2008 c 6 s 1005; 2007 c 496 s 203; 2001 c 42 s 1; 1997 c 58 s 945. Prior: 1989 1st ex.s. c 9 s 204; 1989 c 375 s 3; 1983 1st ex.s. c 45 s 2; 1973 2nd ex.s. c 23 s 1; 1973 1st ex.s. c 157 s 2.]

NOTES:

Part headings not law—Severability—2008 c 6: See RCW 26.60.900 and 26.60.901.

Part headings not law—2007 c 496: See note following RCW 26.09.002.

Effective date—2001 c 42: "This act takes effect October 1, 2001." [ 2001 c 42 s 7.]

Severability—2001 c 42: "If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 2001 c 42 s 8.]

Short title—Part headings, captions, table of contents not law—Exemptions and waivers from federal law—Conflict with federal requirements—Severability—1997 c 58: See RCW 74.08A.900 through 74.08A.904.

Effective date—Severability—1989 1st ex.s. c 9: See RCW 43.70.910 and 43.70.920.